Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-2507
Rules and regulations.

The authority and the Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2016, LB884, § 17.